Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.140

Grants to initiate or improve health science programs.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish and administer a grant program for the purpose of supporting high school career and technical education programs in starting or expanding offerings in health science programs.

(2) Grants must be awarded through a competitive grant process administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. In developing award criteria, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must consult with the workforce training and education coordinating board and the Washington state apprenticeship and training council.

(3) Grant funds may be allocated on a one-time or ongoing basis dependent on the needs of the program and may be used to purchase or improve curriculum, add additional staff, upgrade technology and equipment to meet industry standards, and for other purposes intended to initiate a new health science program or improve the rigor and quality of an existing health science program. Priority must be given to grant applications that include partnerships between employers and exclusive bargaining representatives as sponsors or cosponsors.

(4) Programs receiving funds under this section must meet the minimum criteria for preparatory secondary career and technical education programs under RCW 28A.700.030.

[ 2023 c 126 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 126: See note following RCW 28B.50.800.